apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="sm/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>urt</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørende</l>    <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øre</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ører</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>øring</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ører</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kle__vblex_adj" c="langformer har eigne lemma klede etc.">
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>dt</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj" c="superskcript: klede, kleder, kledes, kledende">
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>dt</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r>¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>        <r>¹<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dte</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ing</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>er</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="spre">            <i>spre</i><par n="kle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kle">             <i>kle</i><par n="kle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="adspre">          <i>adspre</i><par n="kle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utspre">          <i>utspre</i><par n="kle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="atspre">          <i>atspre</i><par n="kle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kle på">             <i>kle</i><par n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>på</ig></e>
<e lm="bre seg">                <i>bre</i><par n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="bre ut">          <i>bre</i><par n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
<e lm="smøre fort">              <i>sm</i><par n="sm/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>fort</ig></e>
<e lm="smøre inn">              <i>sm</i><par n="sm/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>inn</ig></e>
<e lm="spre seg">               <i>spre</i><par n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="spre utover">     <i>spre</i><par n="kle_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>utover</ig></e>
